Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,288.01
Person moving certain buildings or objects; notice required; contents; violation; penalty.

(1) Any person moving a building or an object that, in combination with the transporting vehicle, is over fifteen feet six inches high or wider than the roadway on a county or township road shall notify the local authority and the electric utility responsible for the infrastructure, including poles, wires, substations, and underground residential distribution cable boxes adjacent to or crossing the roadway along the route over which such building or object is being transported. Notification shall be made at least ten days prior to the move. Notification shall specifically describe the transporting vehicle, the width, length, height, and weight of the building or object to be moved, the route to be used, and the date and hours during which the building or object will be transported. Complying with the notification requirement of this section does not exempt the person from complying with any other federal, state, or local authority permit or notification requirements.

(2) Proof of the notification required under subsection (1) of this section must be carried by any person moving a building or an object as described in this section.

(3) Any person who fails to comply with the notification requirements of this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2011, LB164, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB973, § 3.